Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-319
Eminent domain; powers of board of trustees; procedure.

The Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges is hereby given power and authority to acquire by condemnation lands necessary for state colleges. The procedure to condemn such property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in Chapter 76, article 7.

Laws 1953, c. 365, § 1, p. 1144;

Laws 1969, c. 852, § 16, p. 3204.